Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,137
License; revocation or suspension; grounds.

Any license granted under the provisions of sections 81-8,128 to 81-8,142.01 may be revoked or suspended by the State Athletic Commissioner for a violation of the provisions of sections 81-8,128 to 81-8,142.01, the articles of agreement, any rule or regulation of the commissioner, or when the licensee, in the judgment of the commissioner, has been guilty of any act or offense detrimental to the public interest.

Laws 1957, c. 382, § 10, p. 1329;

Laws 1980, LB 849, § 11.